North Carolina, session 2025, SB183.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Military and Veterans Affairs the sum of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) in recurring funds for
each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to fund a part-time Veteran Services Officer position
in Jones County.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S183-v-1*